Tennessee, session 114, HB1721.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-25-123, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(d) A court shall not assess court costs against a defendant if:
(1) The defendant is found not guilty by a jury or by a judge following a
bench trial on all charges for which the defendant was accused;
(2) The prosecution is dismissed or a nolle prosequi is entered by the
state; or
(3) The charges against the defendant are dismissed by the court.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1721
009853
- 1 -